District of Columbia statutes.
1-610.01

Repealed

Creation of Executive Service.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1001, 25 DCR 5740
Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-203, § 2(d), 36 DCR 450
Apr. 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 304(b), 44 DCR 1423
June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(l), 45 DCR 2464
Apr. 12, 2000. D.C. Law 13-91, § 158(b), 47 DCR 520
Procurement, criteria for Council review of multiyear contracts and contracts in excess of $1 million, see § 2-301.05a.
1981 Ed., § 1-611.1.
1973 Ed., § 1-340.1.
Applicability of § 101(l) of D.C. Law 12-124: Section 401(c) of D.C. Law 12-124, as amended by § 60 of D.C. Law 12-264, provided that § 101(h), (l), (m), (n), (o)(2) through (5), (q), (r), (t), (u), (w), and (y) of the act shall apply as of October 21, 1998.